Utah statutes.
73-20-4.   Qualification for financial assistance.
To qualify for financial assistance under this act the farmer shall:
(1)  make written original application to the advisory board and to the board
on forms prescribed by the board in conjunction with the advisory board;
(2)  own or hold under lease a commercial farm which contributed more than
one-half of the farmer's or rancher's gross income from all income sources for
the taxable year 1976;
(3)  comply with any condition imposed by the board for financial assistance
pursuant to authority granted the board under Section 73-20-3.
